src-fst-phonetics-txt2ipa.xfscript.md
retroflex plosive, voiceless			t`  ʈ	    0288, 648 (` = ASCII 096)
retroflex plosive, voiced			d`	ɖ		0256, 598
labiodental nasal					F 	ɱ		0271, 625
retroflex nasal						n` 	ɳ		0273, 627
palatal nasal						J 	ɲ		0272, 626
velar nasal							N 	ŋ		014B, 331
uvular nasal							N\	ɴ		0274, 628
	
bilabial trill						B\ 	ʙ		0299, 665
uvular trill							R\ 	ʀ		0280, 640
alveolar tap							4	ɾ		027E, 638
retroflex flap						r` 	ɽ		027D, 637
bilabial fricative, voiceless		p\ 	ɸ		0278, 632
bilabial fricative, voiced			B 	β		03B2, 946
dental fricative, voiceless			T 	θ		03B8, 952
dental fricative, voiced				D 	ð		00F0, 240
postalveolar fricative, voiceless	S	ʃ		0283, 643
postalveolar fricative, voiced		Z 	ʒ		0292, 658
retroflex fricative, voiceless		s` 	ʂ		0282, 642
retroflex fricative, voiced			z` 	ʐ		0290, 656
palatal fricative, voiceless			C 	ç		00E7, 231
palatal fricative, voiced			j\ 	ʝ		029D, 669
velar fricative, voiced	        	G 	ɣ		0263, 611
uvular fricative, voiceless			X	χ		03C7, 967
uvular fricative, voiced				R 	ʁ		0281, 641
pharyngeal fricative, voiceless		X\ 	ħ		0127, 295
pharyngeal fricative, voiced			?\ 	ʕ		0295, 661
glottal fricative, voiced			h\	ɦ		0266, 614

alveolar lateral fricative, vl.		K 
alveolar lateral fricative, vd.		K\

labiodental approximant				P (or v\) 
alveolar approximant					r\ 
retroflex approximant				r\` 
velar approximant					M\

retroflex lateral approximant		l` 
palatal lateral approximant			L 
velar lateral approximant			L\
Clicks

bilabial								O\	(O = capital letter) 
dental								|\
(post)alveolar						!\ 
palatoalveolar						=\ 
alveolar lateral						|\|\
Ejectives, implosives

ejective								_>	e.g. ejective p		p_>
implosive							_<	e.g. implosive b	b_<
Vowels

close back unrounded					M
close central unrounded 				1 
close central rounded				} 
lax i								I 
lax y								Y 
lax u								U

close-mid front rounded				2 
close-mid central unrounded			@\ 
close-mid central rounded			8 
close-mid back unrounded				7

schwa	ə							@

open-mid front unrounded				E 
open-mid front rounded				9
open-mid central unrounded			3 
open-mid central rounded				3\ 
open-mid back unrounded				V 
open-mid back rounded				O

ash (ae digraph)						{ 
open schwa (turned a)				6

open front rounded					& 
open back unrounded	        		A 
open back rounded					Q
Other symbols

voiceless labial-velar fricative		W 
voiced labial-palatal approx.		H 
voiceless epiglottal fricative		H\ 
voiced epiglottal fricative			<\ 
epiglottal plosive					>\

alveolo-palatal fricative, vl. 		s\ 
alveolo-palatal fricative, voiced	z\ 
alveolar lateral flap				l\ 
simultaneous S and x					x\ 
tie bar								_
Suprasegmentals

primary stress						" 
secondary stress						% 
long									: 
half-long							:\ 
extra-short							_X 
linking mark							-\
Tones and word accents

level extra high						_T 
level high							_H
level mid							_M 
level low							_L 
level extra low						_B
downstep								! 
upstep								^	(caret, circumflex)

contour, rising						 
contour, falling						_F 
contour, high rising					_H_T 
contour, low rising					_B_L 

contour, rising-falling				_R_F 
(NB Instead of being written as diacritics with _, all prosodic 
marks can alternatively be placed in a separate tier, set off 
by < >, as recommended for the next two symbols.)
global rise						<R> 
global fall						<F>
Diacritics						
									
voiceless						_0	(0 = figure), e.g. n_0
voiced							_v 
aspirated						_h 
more rounded						_O	(O = letter) 
less rounded						_c 
advanced							_+
retracted						_-
centralized						_" 
syllabic							=	(or _=) e.g. n= (or n_=) 
non-syllabic						_^ 
rhoticity						`
									
breathy voiced					_t 
creaky voiced					_k
linguolabial						_N 
labialized						_w 
palatalized						'	(or _j) e.g. t' (or t_j) 
velarized						_G 
pharyngealized					_?\
									
dental							_d 
apical							_a 
laminal							_m
nasalized						~	(or _~) e.g. A~ (or A_~) 
nasal release					_n
lateral release					_l 
no audible release				_}

velarized or pharyngealized		_e 
velarized l, alternatively		5 
raised							_r 
lowered							_o 
advanced tongue root				_A 
retracted tongue root			_q

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/phonetics/txt2ipa.xfscript](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-ess/blob/main/src/fst/phonetics/txt2ipa.xfscript)</small>

---
